District of Columbia statutes.
47-2824

Swimming pools.

(a)

Owners or managers of swimming pools, indoor or outdoor, shall pay a license fee of $319 per annum.

(b)

Any license issued pursuant to this section shall be issued as a Public Health: Public Accommodations endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of this chapter.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 625, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 24
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 554, ch. 366
Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title I, § 104(o), 23 DCR 2461
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(21), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(hh)(4)(K), 50 DCR 6913
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(hh)(4)(K) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).
D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (b), substituted “Public Health: Public Accommodations endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “Class A Public Health: Public Accommodations endorsement to a master business license under the master”.
1973 Ed., § 47-2324.
1981 Ed., § 47-2824.
Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.